North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-39.2 Sales Tax
57-39.2-08.2.
Sales tax to be added to purchase price and be a debt.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, retailers shall add the tax imposed under this chapter, or the average equivalent thereof, to the sales price or charge, and when added, such tax constitutes a part of such price or charge, is a debt from the consumer or user to the retailer until paid, and is recoverable at law in the same manner as other debts.

On retail sales of manufactured homes used for residential or business purposes, except as provided in subsection 35 of section 57-39.2-04, retailers shall add the tax imposed under this chapter, or the average equivalent thereof, to the sales price or charge, and when added, such tax constitutes a part of such price or charge, is a debt from the consumer or user to the retailer until paid, and is recoverable at law in the same manner as other debts. In adding such tax to the price or charge, retailers shall add to it three percent of such price or charge.

A retailer shall determine the amount of tax charged to and received from each purchaser by use of a formula that applies the applicable tax rate to each taxable item or total purchase and the product must be carried to the third decimal place. Amounts of tax less than one-half of one cent must be disregarded and amounts of tax of one-half of one cent or more must be considered an additional cent of tax. When a local sales tax applies, the determination of tax charged to and received from each customer will be applied to the aggregated state and local taxes.

Source:

I.M. approved November 2, 1976, S.L. 1977, ch. 593, § 2; 1981, ch. 601, § 3; 1983, ch. 645, § 2; 1987, ch. 705, § 3; 1989, ch. 714, § 3, R.M. disapproved December 5, 1989, S.L. 1991, ch. 740; 2003, ch. 539, § 13; 2005, ch. 582, § 2; 2013, ch. 458, § 3.

Construction With Other Law.

Bankruptcy court did not err in denying creditor claims for unauthorized taxes assessed through the debtor’s horse wagering service business and returned by the state; no unjust enrichment was shown because the improperly collected taxes were not analogous to a sales tax on consumers but instead were paid by the debtor. PW Enters. v. Bala (In re Racing Servs.), — F. Supp. 3d —, 617 B.R. 641, 2020 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 106642 (D.N.D. 2020), aff'd, 854 Fed. Appx. 777, 2021 U.S. App. LEXIS 22883 (8th Cir. N.D. 2021).

57-39.2-08.3.
Sales tax on alcoholic beverages may be included in purchase price. [Expired]

Expired under S.L. 2003, ch. 539, § 25; S.L. 2005, ch. 582, § 2.

57-39.2-09.
Unlawful act.

No retailer may advertise or hold out or state to the public or to any consumer, directly or indirectly, that the tax or any part thereof imposed by this chapter shall be assumed or absorbed by the retailer or that it will not be considered as an element in the price to the consumer or, if added, that it or any part thereof will be refunded.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 459, § 8.

57-39.2-10.
Records required — Sales for resale exempt.

Every retailer required to make a report and pay any tax under this chapter shall preserve such records of the gross proceeds of sale as the commissioner may require and every retailer shall preserve for a period of three years and three months all invoices and other records of goods, wares, or merchandise purchased for resale. All such books, invoices, and other records must be open to examination at any time by the commissioner or any of the commissioner’s duly authorized agents.

Whenever a retailer accepts a resale certificate at the time of making a sale, which sale would otherwise be subject to the sales tax, and such resale certificate contains the sales tax permit number of the purchaser, such retailer making the sale is relieved from submitting the sales tax upon the purchase price of the merchandise sold. Whenever a person submits a false resale certificate to a retailer, the person submitting the certificate is personally liable for the tax on the sale.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 459, § 9; 1967, ch. 460, § 3; 1971, ch. 573, § 1; 1973, ch. 480, § 2; 1975, ch. 552, § 1.

57-39.2-10.1.
Responsibilities of special events promoters — Penalty.

A promoter or organizer of a special event at which twenty-five or more special event vendors participate shall, within twenty days following a special event, provide to the tax commissioner a list identifying each participating special event vendor. The list must be in the form and manner prescribed by the tax commissioner and must contain the name and sales tax permit number of each special vendor. Records must be retained by the promoter or organizer to the same extent as all transactions involving sales or use tax as provided in section 57-39.2-10. For purposes of this section:

“Promoter” or “organizer” means a person or entity that organizes or promotes a special event that results in the rental, occupation, or use of a structure, lot, tract of land, motor vehicle, sample or display case, table, or any other similar items for the provision of displays, promotional activities, or sale of tangible personal property or services by special event vendors.

“Special event” means an entertainment, amusement, recreation, or marketing event that occurs at a single location on a recurring or irregular basis and where sales, displays, or promotional activities occur. Special events include auto shows, boat shows, gun shows, sport shows, knife shows, home shows, craft shows, flea markets, carnivals, circuses, bazaars, fairs, and art or other merchandise displays or exhibits.

“Special event vendor” means a person or entity making sales, providing displays, or otherwise engaging in promotional activities at a special event.

A special event does not include an event that is organized for the exclusive benefit of a nonprofit organization if all of the net proceeds of the retail sales of all vendors at the event inure to the benefit of a nonprofit organization.

A promoter or organizer of a special event who fails or refuses to comply with this section may be subject to a penalty of two hundred fifty dollars per event, which amount may be waived by the tax commissioner for good cause shown.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection 1, if a promoter or organizer includes a special event vendor in a list previously submitted to the tax commissioner under subsection 1, the promoter or organizer is not required to include the same special event vendor in a list submitted to the tax commissioner for a subsequent special event held within six months of the first event.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 531, § 1; 2021, ch. 474, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

57-39.2-11.
Return of gross receipts.

Except as provided in section 57-39.2-12 for monthly reports and payments, on or before the last day of the month following the close of the first quarterly period, and on or before the last day of the month following each subsequent quarterly period of three months, the retailer shall make out a return for the preceding quarterly period in the form and manner as may be prescribed by the commissioner, showing the gross receipts of the retailer, the amount of the tax for the period covered by the return, and any further information as the commissioner may require to enable the retailer correctly to compute and collect the tax herein levied. The commissioner, upon request by any retailer and a proper showing of the necessity therefor, may grant unto the retailer an extension of time not to exceed thirty days for making a return. If the extension is granted to any retailer, the time in which the retailer is required to make payment as provided for in section 57-39.2-12 must be extended for the same period but interest must be charged upon the amount of the deferred payment at the rate of twelve percent per annum from the date the tax would have been due if the extension had not been granted to the date the tax is paid.

The commissioner may require the filing of returns and payment of tax on a monthly, quarterly, annual, or other basis when the commissioner deems it necessary to ensure payment of the tax imposed by this chapter. If the retailer’s filing responsibility has been assumed by a certified service provider, the retailer may authorize the certified service provider to claim on behalf of the retailer all or part of the compensation to which the retailer is entitled under sections 57-39.2-12.1 and 57-40.2-07.1.

Returns must be signed by the retailer or a duly authorized agent of the retailer and must contain a written declaration that they are made and subscribed under the penalties of this chapter. The tax commissioner may prescribe alternative methods for signing, subscribing, or verifying a return filed by electronic means, including telecommunications, that shall have the same validity and consequence as the actual signature and written declaration for a paper return.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 459, § 10; 1969, ch. 524, § 1; 1975, ch. 553, § 1; 1983, ch. 648, § 1; 1987, ch. 712, § 2; 1991, ch. 667, § 2; 1997, ch. 54, § 4; 2005, ch. 581, § 1; 2017, ch. 409, § 4, effective July 1, 2017.

57-39.2-12.
Payment of tax — Bond — Creation of lien.

The tax levied under this chapter is due and payable in quarterly installments on or before the last day of the month next succeeding each calendar quarterly period, except that if total sales subject to sales and use taxes for the preceding calendar year for any business which has been issued a sales tax permit equal or exceed three hundred thirty-three thousand dollars, the tax levied under this chapter is payable monthly on or before the last day of the next succeeding month. The tax commissioner may, upon request and for good cause shown, waive the requirement to file and remit monthly. The retailer shall pay the total tax due in the manner prescribed by the tax commissioner. Penalties and interest for failure to file a return, for filing an incorrect return, or for failure to pay the tax due are those prescribed in section 57-39.2-18. If the total of sales subject to the tax decreases below three hundred thirty-three thousand dollars for any succeeding year, the retailer may return to quarterly filing and payments. When there is a sale of any business by any retailer or when any business is discontinued by a retailer, the tax becomes due immediately prior to the sale or discontinuance of the business and if not paid within fifteen days thereafter it becomes delinquent and subject to the penalties provided in section 57-39.2-18. In the event of a business reorganization in which the ownership of the business organization remains in the same person or persons as prior to the reorganization, the total sales subject to sales and use taxes for the preceding calendar year for the business that was reorganized must be used to determine whether the tax is payable monthly under this subsection.

Every retailer, at the time of making the return required hereunder, shall compute and pay to the commissioner the tax due for the preceding period.

The commissioner, when in the commissioner’s judgment it is necessary and advisable to do so in order to secure the collection of the tax levied under this chapter, may require any person subject to such tax to file with the commissioner a bond, issued by a surety company authorized to transact business in this state and approved by the insurance commissioner as to solvency and responsibility in such amount as the commissioner may fix, to secure the payment of any tax and penalties due or which may become due from such person. In lieu of such bond, securities approved by the commissioner in such amounts as the commissioner prescribes, may be deposited with the commissioner, which securities must be kept in the custody of the commissioner and may be sold by the commissioner at public or private sale, without notice to the depositor thereof, if it becomes necessary so to do in order to recover any tax and penalties due. All moneys deposited as security with the commissioner under the provisions of this subsection must be paid by the commissioner to the state treasurer and must be credited by the state treasurer into a special fund to be known as the retail sales and use tax security trust fund. If any tax, penalty, or costs imposed by this chapter are not paid when due, by the person depositing moneys with the commissioner as security for the payment of tax, penalty, or costs imposed by this chapter, the commissioner shall certify that information to the director of the office of management and budget who shall transmit the money to the commissioner who shall apply the money deposited by the person or so much thereof as is necessary to satisfy the tax and penalties due. The commissioner, when in the commissioner’s judgment it is no longer necessary to require the deposit to be maintained by the person, shall certify that information to the director of the office of management and budget who shall pay the unused money to the person entitled thereto.

Remittances on account of tax due under this chapter may not be deemed or considered payment thereof unless or until the commissioner has collected or received the amount due for such tax in cash or equivalent credit.

A retailer required to file monthly returns under subsection 1 shall file the returns by an electronic method approved by the commissioner. A retailer that does not comply with the requirement to file reports electronically is deemed to have failed to file the sales and use tax returns as provided in section 57-39.2-15 and is subject to the penalties provided in section 57-39.2-18. The commissioner may, for good cause shown, waive the filing requirements of this subsection.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 459, § 11; 1983, ch. 648, § 2; 1985, ch. 640, § 1; 1987, ch. 714, § 1; 1991, ch. 681, § 1; 1999, ch. 520, § 1; 2009, ch. 566, § 1; 2013, ch. 463, § 1; 2019, ch. 477, § 8, eff for sales and use tax returns due after July 31, 2019.

57-39.2-12.1.
Deduction to reimburse retailer for administrative expenses.

A retailer registered to report and remit sales, use, or gross receipts tax imposed under chapter 57-39.2, 57-39.5, 57-39.6, or 57-40.2 may deduct and retain one and one-half percent of the tax due. The aggregate of deductions allowed by this section and section 57-40.2-07.1 may not exceed one hundred ten dollars per return. Retailers that receive compensation under this subsection may not receive additional compensation under subsection 2 or 3 for the same period.

A certified service provider that contracts with retailers to calculate, collect, and remit tax due on behalf of retailers may deduct and retain from the tax remitted to the tax commissioner compensation or a monetary allowance up to the amount approved by the streamlined sales and use tax governing board effective June 1, 2006. The compensation provided in this subsection applies only to tax remitted by certified service providers on behalf of retailers that are remote sellers registered to collect sales and use tax in this state under chapter 57-39.4. Certified service providers that receive compensation under this subsection may not receive additional compensation under subsection 1 or 3 for the same period.

A retailer that is a remote seller registered to collect sales and use tax under chapter 57-39.4 and that uses a certified automated system to calculate, report, and remit tax due under chapters 57-39.2, 57-39.4, and 57-40.2 may deduct and retain compensation or a monetary allowance up to the amount approved by the streamlined sales and use tax governing board during its December 2006 meeting. Retailers that receive compensation under this subsection may not receive additional compensation under subsection 1 or 2 for the same period.

For purposes of this section, “remote seller” means a retailer that does not have an adequate physical presence to establish nexus in this state for sales and use tax purposes.

Compensation may not be deducted and retained under this section unless the tax due is paid within the time limitations under section 57-39.2-12 or 57-40.2-07 or chapter 57-39.4. If a retailer fails to timely file a return or pay the tax due, the tax commissioner may, for good cause shown, allow the retailer to deduct and retain the compensation under this section.

The deduction allowed retailers or certified service providers by this section is to reimburse retailers directly or indirectly for expenses incurred in keeping records, preparing and filing returns, remitting the tax, and supplying information to the tax commissioner upon request.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 648, § 3; 1987, ch. 712, § 3; 1999, ch. 520, § 2; 2005, ch. 581, § 2; 2007, ch. 532, § 1; 2011, ch. 467, § 2; 2013, ch. 464, § 1; 2015, ch. 434, § 2, effective August 1, 2015.

57-39.2-13.
Lien of tax — Collection — Action authorized.

Whenever any taxpayer liable to pay a tax or penalty imposed refuses or neglects to pay the same, the amount, including any interest, penalty, or addition to such tax, together with the costs that may accrue in addition thereto, is a lien in favor of the state of North Dakota upon all property and rights to property, whether real or personal, belonging to said taxpayer, and in the case of property in which a deceased taxpayer held an interest as joint tenant or otherwise with right of survivorship at the time of death, the lien continues as a lien against the property in the hands of the survivor or survivors to the extent of the deceased taxpayer’s interest therein, which interest must be determined by dividing the value of the entire property at the time of the taxpayer’s death by the number of joint tenants or persons interested therein.

The lien aforesaid attaches at the time the tax becomes due and payable and continues until the liability for such amount is satisfied. For the purposes of this provision the words “due” and “due and payable” mean the first instant at which the tax becomes due.

Any mortgagee, purchaser, judgment creditor, or lien claimant acquiring any interest in, or lien on, any property situated in the state, prior to the commissioner filing in the central indexing system maintained by the secretary of state, a notice of the lien provided for in section 57-39.2-12, takes free of, or has priority over, the lien.

The commissioner shall index in the central indexing system the following data:

The name of the taxpayer.

The name “State of North Dakota” as claimant.

The date and time the notice of lien was indexed.

The amount of the lien.

The internal revenue service taxpayer identification number or social security number of the taxpayer.

The commissioner is exempt from the payment of the filing fees as otherwise provided by law for the indexing of the notice of lien, or for its satisfaction.

Upon payment of the tax as to which the commissioner has indexed notice in the central indexing system, the commissioner shall index a satisfaction of the lien in the central indexing system.

The attorney general, upon the request of the commissioner, shall bring an action at law or in equity, as the facts may justify, without bond to enforce payment of any taxes and any penalties, or to foreclose the lien therefor in the manner provided for mortgages on real or personal property, and in such action shall have the assistance of the state’s attorney of the county in which the action is pending.

It is expressly provided that the foregoing remedies of the state are cumulative and that no action taken by the commissioner or attorney general may be construed to be an election on the part of the state or any of its officers to pursue any remedy hereunder to the exclusion of any other remedy provided by law.

The technical, legal requirements outlined in this section relating to tax liens on all real and personal property of the taxpayer to ensure payment of the taxes, including penalties, interest, and other costs, are self-explanatory.

The notice of lien is effective as of eight a.m. next following the indexing of the notice. Any notice of lien filed by the commissioner may be indexed in the central indexing system without changing its original priority as to property in the county where the lien was filed.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 459, § 12; 1973, ch. 475, § 2; 1995, ch. 548, § 4; 1997, ch. 478, § 4; 1999, ch. 313, § 8; 2001, ch. 120, § 1; 2011, ch. 456, § 8; 2013, ch. 257, § 39; 2015, ch. 372, § 1.

57-39.2-14.
Permits — Application fee for reissuance.

A person may not engage in or transact business as a retailer within this state unless a permit or permits shall have been issued to that person as hereinafter prescribed. Every person desiring to engage in or conduct business as a retailer within this state shall file with the commissioner an application for a permit or permits. Every application for such a permit shall be made upon a form prescribed by the commissioner and shall set forth the name under which the applicant transacts or intends to transact business, the location of the applicant’s place or places of business, and such other information as the commissioner may require. The application shall be signed by the owner if a natural person; in the case of an association, partnership, or limited liability company, by a member or partner thereof; and in the case of a corporation, by an executive officer thereof or some person specifically authorized by the corporation to sign the application, to which shall be attached the written evidence of that person’s authority. Any person registering under the agreement adopted under chapter 57-39.4 shall register in this state. Any person who is registered under the agreement is not required to sign the application and may register through an agent. Any person who is registered under such agreement may cancel its registration at any time but is liable for remitting any sales taxes collected before cancellation. Registration under the agreement and collection of tax does not in and of itself create nexus for other taxes or fees imposed by this state.

Upon determining that each applicant for a sales tax permit is a bona fide retailer, the commissioner shall grant and issue to each applicant a permit for each place of business within the state. A permit is not assignable and shall be valid only for the person in whose name it is issued and for the transaction of business at the place designated therein. It shall at all times be conspicuously displayed at the place for which issued. Any transient merchant who is in the business of soliciting or making sales at retail to consumers shall, before soliciting such a sale from a consumer, exhibit to the consumer or prospective consumer the retail sales tax permit required by this section; for the purposes of this sentence the term “transient merchant” shall include any person, individual, copartnership, corporation, or limited liability company, either as principal or agent, who solicits, engages in, does, or transacts any temporary or transient business in this state, either in one locality, or in traveling from place to place in this state, selling goods, wares, and merchandise, who does not intend to become and does not become a permanent merchant of such place, and who, for the purpose of carrying on such business, hires, leases, occupies, or uses, a building, structure, lot, tract, railroad car, motor vehicle, or display case or sample case of any kind for the exhibition and sale of such goods, wares, and merchandise.

Permits issued under the provisions of this section shall be valid and effective until revoked by the commissioner.

Whenever the holder of a permit fails to comply with any of the provisions of this chapter or any rules or regulations prescribed by the commissioner and adopted under this chapter, or whenever the holder of a permit shall file returns showing no tax due for four consecutive quarters, the commissioner, upon hearing after giving ten days’ notice of the time and place of the hearing to show cause why the holder’s permit should not be revoked, may revoke the permit. The commissioner also shall have the power to restore licenses after such revocation.

Whenever the holder of a permit has had such a permit revoked for failure to comply with the provisions of this chapter or any rules and regulations prescribed by the commissioner and adopted under this chapter, the commissioner shall charge a fee of fifty dollars for the issuance or reissuance of such permit. However, if a permit was revoked for filing returns showing no tax due for four consecutive quarters, the commissioner shall charge only a fee of five dollars for the issuance or reissuance of such permit.

All permits in effect at the time this chapter takes effect are hereby continued and shall remain in full force and effect unless revoked as herein provided. However, the commissioner may issue a new form of permit to replace, at no charge to the permitholders, all permits previously granted and issued that have not been revoked or surrendered.

Whenever the holder of a permit is convicted of violating section 12.1-23-16, the commissioner shall revoke the permit and the holder is not eligible to receive another permit for a period of ten years from the date of conviction. Any person convicted of violating section 12.1-23-16 who is not a holder of a permit at the time of conviction is not eligible to receive a permit for a period of ten years from the date of conviction.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 459, § 13; 1979, ch. 598, § 7; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 2003, ch. 539, § 14; 2005, ch. 582, § 2; 2013, ch. 108, § 3.

57-39.2-14.1.
Commissioner may authorize direct payment of sales and use tax.

Upon application by any person, the commissioner may issue to the applicant, subject to such terms and conditions as the commissioner deems reasonable and necessary, a permit to be known as a direct payment permit authorizing such applicant to make direct payment to the commissioner of any sales or use tax imposed on any purchase, use, storage, or consumption in this state of tangible personal property or services by such applicant. Such applicant may elect to pay any such taxes directly to the commissioner and for that purpose may issue to the retailer selling or furnishing the tangible personal property or services subject to such taxes a direct payment certificate in the form prescribed by the commissioner, assuming the obligation to pay all such taxes, and the receipt of such certificate discharges such retailer from any duty to collect or liability for such taxes. Such direct payment permit may be revoked by the commissioner, with or without cause, at any time.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 547, § 1.

57-39.2-15.
Failure to file return — Incorrect return.

If a return required by this chapter is not filed, or if a return when filed is incorrect or insufficient, the commissioner shall determine the amount of tax due from any information as the commissioner may be able to obtain, and, if necessary, may estimate the tax on the basis of external indices, such as number of employees of the person concerned, rentals paid by the person, the person’s stock on hand, and other factors. The commissioner shall give notice of the determination to the person liable for the tax. If the determination of tax due relates to an incorrect or insufficient return filed by a taxpayer, notice of the determination must be given not later than three years after the last day on which the return was due or three years after the return was filed, whichever period expires later; if it is determined upon audit that the tax due was twenty-five percent or more above the amount reported on a return, notice of determination of tax due must be given not later than six years after the last day on which the return was due or six years after the return was filed, whichever is later. Notice of determination of tax due for any reporting period for which a taxpayer failed to file a return must be given not later than six years after the due date of the return but if fraudulent information is given in a return or the failure to file a return is due to the fraudulent intent or willful attempt of the taxpayer in any manner to evade the tax, the time limitation herein provided for giving notice of the determination of tax due does not apply. The determination of tax due fixes the tax finally and irrevocably unless the person against whom it is assessed, within thirty days after the giving of notice of the determination, protests the determination under rules adopted by the commissioner and under chapter 28-32.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 459, § 14; 1969, ch. 525, § 1; 1973, ch. 480, § 3; 1983, ch. 649, § 1; 1991, ch. 648, § 7.

57-39.2-15.1.
Extensions of time to perform sales tax audits.

Before the expiration of time prescribed in section 57-39.2-15 for the assessment of tax, the commissioner and the taxpayer may agree in writing to an extension of time for the assessment of the tax. The tax may be assessed at any time prior to the expiration of the period agreed upon. The period agreed upon may be extended by subsequent agreements in writing made before the expiration of the period previously agreed upon. No extension may be for more than one year from the date of the extension agreement.

If a taxpayer agrees to an extension of time for assessment of tax, the period of time for refund claims will be similarly extended.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 641, § 1; 1991, ch. 648, § 8.

57-39.2-15.2.
Governor and manager liability.

If a limited liability company required to hold a permit under this chapter fails for any reason to file the required returns or to pay the taxes due under this chapter, the governors, managers, or members of a member-controlled limited liability company, jointly or severally, charged with the responsibility of supervising the preparation of the returns and payments are personally liable for the failure. The dissolution of a limited liability company does not discharge a governor’s, manager’s, or member’s liability for a prior failure of the limited liability company to file a return or remit the tax due. The taxes, penalty, and interest may be assessed and collected under the provisions of this chapter.

If the governors, managers, or members elect not to be personally liable for the failure to file the required returns or to pay the tax due, the limited liability company must be required to make a cash deposit or post with the tax commissioner a bond or undertaking executed by a surety company authorized to do business in this state. The cash deposit, bond, or undertaking provided for in this section must be in an amount equal to the estimated annual sales tax liability of the limited liability company.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 54, § 96; 1999, ch. 509, § 5; 1999, ch. 522, § 1; 2001, ch. 521, § 3.

57-39.2-15.3.
Liability of a general partner in a limited liability limited partnership.

If a limited liability limited partnership required to hold a permit under this chapter fails for any reason to file the required returns or to pay the tax due under this chapter, the general partners, jointly or severally, charged with the responsibility of supervising the preparation of the returns and payment of the tax are personally liable for the partnership’s failure. The dissolution of a limited liability limited partnership does not discharge a general partner’s liability for a prior failure of the partnership to file a return or remit the tax due. The taxes, penalty, and interest may be assessed and collected pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

If the general partners elect not to be personally liable for the failure to file the required returns or to pay the tax due, the limited liability limited partnership must make a cash deposit or post with the commissioner a bond or undertaking executed by a surety company authorized to do business in this state. The cash deposit, bond, or undertaking must be in an amount equal to the estimated annual sales tax liability of the limited liability limited partnership.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 443, § 33.

57-39.2-16.
Appeals.

An appeal may be taken by the taxpayer to the district court of the county in which the taxpayer resides, or in which the taxpayer’s principal place of business is located, within thirty days after the taxpayer has received notice from the commissioner of the commissioner’s determination as provided for in section 57-39.2-15. The appeal must be taken pursuant to and in accordance with chapter 28-32.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 459, § 15; 1969, ch. 525, §§ 2, 3.

57-39.2-17.
Service of notice.

Any notice, except notice of appeals, authorized or required under the provisions of this chapter may be given by mailing the same to the person for whom it is intended by registered or certified mail addressed to such person at the address given in the last return filed by that person pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, or if no return has been filed, then such address as may be obtainable. The mailing of such notice is presumptive evidence of the receipt of the same by the person to whom addressed. Any period of time which is determined according to the provisions of this chapter by giving of notice commences to run from the date of registration and posting of such notice.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 459, § 16; 1971, ch. 573, § 2; 1973, ch. 480, § 6.

Note:

Section 2 of chapter 476, S.L. 2021, provides, “APPLICATION. This Act applies to net sales, gross receipts, use, and motor vehicle excise tax collections received by the tax commissioner after June 30, 2021.”

57-39.2-18.
Penalties — Offenses.

If any person fails to file a return or corrected return or to pay any tax within the time required by this chapter or, if upon audit, is found to owe additional tax, the person is subject to interest of one percent of the tax per month or fraction of a month of delay except the first month after the return or the tax became due.

In addition to the tax and interest prescribed in this chapter, a taxpayer is subject to penalties as follows:

If any taxpayer, without intent to evade any tax imposed by this chapter, fails to file a return, on or before the prescribed or extended due date, a penalty equal to five percent of the tax required to be reported, or five dollars, whichever is greater, must be added if the failure is for not more than one month, counting each fraction of a month as an entire month, with an additional five percent for each additional month or fraction of a month during which the failure continues, not exceeding twenty-five percent in the aggregate.

If any taxpayer, without intent to evade any tax imposed by this chapter, fails to pay the amount shown as tax due on any return, filed on or before the prescribed or extended due date, a penalty of five percent of the tax due, or five dollars, whichever is greater, must be added to the tax.

If upon audit of a taxpayer’s return an additional tax is found to be due, penalty as prescribed in subdivision a or b must be added to the tax.

The commissioner, if satisfied that the delay was excusable, may waive, and if paid, refund all or any part of the penalty and interest. The penalty and interest must be paid to the commissioner and disposed of in the same manner as other receipts under this chapter. Unpaid penalties and interest may be enforced in the same manner as the tax imposed by this chapter.

Any person who sells tangible personal property, tickets or admissions to places of amusement, and athletic events, or steam, gas, and communication service at retail in this state after that person’s permit shall have been revoked, or without procuring a permit as provided in section 57-39.2-14, or who violates section 57-39.2-09, and the officers of any corporation or the managers of any limited liability company who so acts, is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

The certificate of the commissioner to the effect that a tax has not been paid, that a return has not been filed, or that information has not been supplied pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, shall be prima facie evidence thereof.

Any person failing to comply with any of the provisions of this chapter, or failing to remit within the time herein provided to the state the tax due on any sale or purchase of tangible personal property subject to said sales tax, shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 459, § 17; 1969, ch. 526, § 1; 1971, ch. 536, § 4; 1975, ch. 106, §§ 610, 673; 1979, ch. 611, § 2; 1981, ch. 598, § 5; 1983, ch. 650, § 1; 1989, ch. 721, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 2001, ch. 530, § 2; 2009, ch. 65, § 6.

Cross-References.

Penalty for class A misdemeanor, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

57-39.2-18.1.
Corporate officer liability.

If a corporation required to hold a permit issued under this chapter fails for any reason to file the required returns or to pay the tax due, the president, vice president, secretary, or treasurer of the corporation, jointly or severally, having control, or supervision of, or charged with the responsibility for making the returns and payments are personally liable for the failure. The dissolution of a corporation shall not discharge an officer’s liability for a prior failure of the corporation to make a return or remit the tax due. The sum due for the liability may be assessed and collected pursuant to the provisions of this chapter for the assessment and collection of other liabilities.

If the corporate officers elect not to be personally liable for the failure to file the required returns or to pay the tax due, the corporation must be required to make a cash deposit or post with the tax commissioner a bond or undertaking executed by a surety company authorized to do business in this state. The cash deposit, bond, or undertaking provided for in this section must be in an amount equal to the estimated annual sales tax liability of the corporation.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 548, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1995, ch. 103, § 77; 1999, ch. 509, § 6; 1999, ch. 522, § 2.

57-39.2-19.
Commissioner to administer chapter.

The commissioner is hereby charged with the administration of this chapter and the taxes imposed thereby. Such commissioner may prescribe all rules and regulations not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter, necessary and advisable for its detailed administration and to effectuate the purposes, including the right to provide for the issuance and sale by the state of coupons covering the amount of tax or taxes to be paid under this chapter, if such method is deemed advisable by said commissioner.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 459, § 18.

57-39.2-20.
Tax, penalties, and other charges paid to commissioner — Disposition.

All fees, taxes, penalties, and other charges imposed and collected under this chapter must be paid to the commissioner in the form of a remittance payable to the commissioner, who shall transmit each payment monthly to the state treasurer to be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the general fund.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 459, § 19.